Florida, session 2026, SB62.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 19 20 Section 1.âParagraphs (b) and (c) of subsection (1) of 21 section 99.021, Florida Statutes, are amended, and paragraph (f) 22 is added to that subsection, to read: 23 99.021âForm of candidate oath.â 24 (1) 25 (b)âIn addition, any person seeking to qualify for 26 nomination as a candidate of any political party shall, at the 27 time of subscribing to the oath or affirmation, state in 28 writing: 29 1.âThe party of which the person is a member. 30 2.âThat the person has been a registered member of the 31 political party for which he or she is seeking nomination as a 32 candidate for at least 365 consecutive days preceding before the 33 beginning of qualifying before preceding the general election 34 for which the person seeks to qualify. 35 3.âThat the person has paid the assessment levied against 36 him or her, if any, as a candidate for said office by the 37 executive committee of the party of which he or she is a member. 38 (c)âIn addition, any person seeking to qualify for office 39 as a candidate with no party affiliation shall, at the time of 40 subscribing to the oath or affirmation, state in writing that he 41 or she is registered without any party affiliation and that he 42 or she has not been a registered member of any political party 43 for at least 365 consecutive days preceding before the beginning 44 of qualifying before preceding the general election for which 45 the person seeks to qualify. 46 (f)âThe statements in subparagraph (b)2. and paragraph (c) 47 constitute substantive requirements for the person completing 48 the statement, and compliance with those requirements is 49 mandatory. The sole method to enforce compliance with such 50 requirements is contained in this paragraph. Compliance with 51 subparagraph (b)2. and paragraph (c) may be challenged by a 52 qualified candidate or a political party with qualified 53 candidates in the same race by filing an action in the circuit 54 court for the county in which the qualifying officer is 55 headquartered. A person may not be qualified as a candidate for 56 nomination or election and his or her name may not appear on the 57 ballot if in an order that has become final, the court 58 determines that: 59 1.âThe person seeking to qualify for nomination as a 60 candidate of any political party has not been a registered 61 member of that party for the 365-day period preceding the 62 beginning of qualifying; or 63 2.âThe person seeking to qualify for office as a candidate 64 with no party affiliation has not been registered without party 65 affiliation for, or has been a registered member of any 66 political party during, the 365-day period preceding the 67 beginning of qualifying. 68 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.